Utah statutes.
76-5-302.   Aggravated kidnapping.
(1)  An actor commits aggravated kidnapping if the actor, in the course of
committing unlawful detention or kidnapping:
(a)  possesses, uses, or threatens to use a dangerous weapon as defined in
Section 76-1-601; or
(b)  acts with intent:
(i)  to hold the victim for ransom or reward, or as a shield or hostage, or to
compel a third person to engage in particular conduct or to forbear from
engaging in particular conduct;
(ii)  to facilitate the commission, attempted commission, or flight after
commission or attempted commission of a felony;
(iii)  to hinder or delay the discovery of or reporting of a felony;
(iv)  to inflict bodily injury on or to terrorize the victim or another;
(v)  to interfere with the performance of any governmental or political
function; or
(vi)  to commit a sexual offense as described in Title 76, Chapter 5, Part 4,
Sexual Offenses.
(2)  As used in this section, "in the course of committing unlawful detention
or kidnapping" means in the course of committing, attempting to commit, or in
the immediate flight after the attempt or commission of a violation of:
(a)  Section 76-5-301, kidnapping; or
(b)  Section 76-5-304, unlawful detention.
(3)  Aggravated kidnapping is a first degree felony punishable by a term of
imprisonment of:
(a)  except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), (3)(c), or (4), not less than 15
years and which may be for life;
(b)  except as provided in Subsection (3)(c) or (4), life without parole, if
the trier of fact finds that during the course of the commission of the
aggravated kidnapping the defendant caused serious bodily injury to another;
or
(c)  life without parole, if the trier of fact finds that at the time of the
commission of the aggravated kidnapping, the defendant was previously
convicted of a grievous sexual offense.
(4)  If, when imposing a sentence under Subsection (3)(a) or (b), a court
finds that a lesser term than the term described in Subsection (3)(a) or (b)
is in the interests of justice and states the reasons for this finding on the
record, the court may impose a term of imprisonment of not less than:
(a)  for purposes of Subsection (3)(b), 15 years and which may be for life; or
(b)  for purposes of Subsection (3)(a) or (b):
(i)  10 years and which may be for life; or
(ii)  six years and which may be for life.
(5)  The provisions of Subsection (4) do not apply when a person is sentenced
under Subsection (3)(c).
(6)  Imprisonment under this section is mandatory in accordance with Section
76-3-406.
